Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5016.03
Subpoena for witness; contents.

A subpoena of the commission shall be directed to the person named therein, requiring him or her to attend at a particular time and place and to testify as a witness. The subpoena may contain a clause directing the witness to bring with him or her any book, writing, or other thing under his or her control, which he or she is bound by law to produce as evidence.

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 54.